Utah, session 2026, HB66.
Section 1. Section 63I-1-204 is amended to read:63I-1-204. Repeal dates: Title 4.(1)Section 4-2-108, Agricultural Advisory Board created -- Composition -- Responsibility -- Terms of office -- Compensation -- Executive committee, is repealed July 1, 2028.(2)Section 4-17-104, Creation of State Weed Committee -- Membership -- Powers and duties -- Expenses, is repealed July 1, 2026.(3)Title 4, Chapter 18, Part 3, Utah Soil Health Program, is repealed July 1, 20262036.(4)Section 4-20-103, Utah Grazing Improvement Program Advisory Board -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 2032.(5)Section 4-23-104, Agricultural and Wildlife Damage Prevention Board created -- Composition -- Appointment -- Terms -- Vacancies -- Compensation, is repealed July 1, 2034.(6)Section 4-23-105, Board responsibilities -- Damage prevention policy -- Rules -- Methods to control predators and depredating birds and animals, is repealed July 1, 2034.(7)Section 4-24-104, Livestock Brand Board created -- Composition -- Terms -- Removal -- Quorum for transaction of business -- Compensation -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 2035.(8)Section 4-39-104, Domesticated Elk Act advisory council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(9)Title 4, Chapter 46, Part 2, Land Conservation Board, is repealed July 1, 2027.(10)Subsection 4-46-304(2)(d), regarding the Land Conservation Board, is repealed July 1, 2027.(11)Subsection 4-46-401(3)(a), regarding the Land Conservation Board, is repealed July 1, 2027.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.